Illinois, session 104th, SB2212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Enslavement Era Disclosure and Redress Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Administrator" means the individual appointed by the 8Office to oversee, implement, and enforce the provisions of 9this Act. 10    "Awarding authority" means a subordinate or component 11entity or person of the State that has the authority to enter 12into a contract or agreement for the provision of goods or 13services on behalf of the State. 14    "Company" means any person, firm, corporation, 15partnership, or other business entity. 16    "Contract" means any agreement, franchise, lease, or 17concession, including an agreement for any occasional 18professional or technical personal services, the performance 19of any work or service, the provision of any materials or 20supplies, or the rendering of any service to the State of 21Illinois or the public that is let, awarded, or entered into 22with or on behalf of the State or any awarding authority. 23    "Contractor" means any company that has submitted a bid or   SB2212- 2 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1is in the process of submitting a bid, whether competitive or 2not, to contract with the State or any awarding authority of 3the State. 4    "Descendant" means any living individual who can trace the 5individual's lineage or ancestry directly or indirectly to an 6enslaved person or persons. "Descendant" includes, but is not 7limited to, children, grandchildren, great-grandchildren, and 8subsequent generations, whether through biological or adoptive 9relationships, as well as individuals with verifiable 10genealogical evidence or documentation that establishes a 11familial connection to an enslaved person. The term 12"descendant" is intended to encompass a broad range of 13familial connections, recognizing the historical and societal 14impacts of the institution of slavery on the affected 15individuals and their families. 16    "Eligible redress project" means any reparatory project or 17program identified by the relevant stakeholders for 18reparations in tandem with the Illinois Legislative Black 19Caucus. 20    "Enslaved person" means any person who lived in the United 21States or the territories that preceded the establishment of 22the United States that became part of the United States: 23        (1) who was subject to the will of another; 24        (2) who was deemed by law to be the property of 25    another; 26        (3) whose person and services were wholly under the   SB2212- 3 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1    control of another in a state of enforced compulsory 2    service; and 3        (4) who could not legally leave enforced compulsory 4    service to another on such person's own volition at any 5    time during the person's lifetime and during the 6    Enslavement Era. 7    "Enslavement Era" means the historical period during which 8the institution of slavery was legally recognized, practiced, 9and enforced in the United States, spanning from the early 1017th Century until the ratification of the 13th Amendment to 11the United States Constitution in 1865. 12    "Investment" means to make use of an enslaved person for 13future benefits or advantages. 14    "Office" means the Illinois Office of Equity. 15    "Participant" means a person or entity who participated in 16slaveholding or participated in the slave trade. 17    "Participation in slaveholding" means having been a 18slaveholder during the Enslavement Era. 19    "Participation in the slave trade" means having: 20        (1) issued slavery insurance policies, including, but 21    not limited to, policies issued to slaveholders for damage 22    to or death of enslaved persons and policies issued to 23    insure business transactions and operations related to the 24    traffic in enslaved persons; 25        (2) purchased, sold, or held enslaved persons for the 26    purposes of transferring them;   SB2212- 4 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1        (3) provided loans to others to facilitate the 2    purchase, sale, transport, or enslavement of enslaved 3    persons; 4        (4) used enslaved persons as collateral for insurance 5    policies, loans, or other transactions; 6        (5) facilitated the traffic in enslaved persons by 7    transporting such persons by boat or rail; or 8        (6) provided any other services to aid and abet the 9    traffic in enslaved persons. 10    "Predecessor entity" means an entity whose ownership, 11title, and interest, including all rights, benefits, duties, 12and liabilities were acquired in an uninterrupted chain of 13succession by the entity. 14    "Profit" means any economic advantage or financial benefit 15derived from the use of enslaved persons. 16    "Related party" means any parent entity, subsidiary, or 17predecessor entity of the contractor or company.18    "Slaveholder" means an individual holder of an enslaved 19person or an owner of a company that held enslaved persons for 20the purpose of labor, purchase, sale, or financing. 21    "Slavery era insurance" means slavery insurance policies, 22including, but not limited to, policies issued to participants 23for damage to or death of enslaved persons and policies issued 24to insure business transactions and operations related to the 25traffic in enslaved persons; evidence of the purchase and sale 26of enslaved persons; provision of loans to purchase enslaved   SB2212- 5 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1persons; or the use of enslaved persons as collateral for 2insurance policies, loans, or other transactions. 3    "Slave trade" means: (1) all acts involved in the capture, 4acquisition, or disposal of a person with the intent to reduce 5that person to slavery; (2) all acts involved in the 6acquisition of an enslaved person with a view to selling or 7exchanging that enslaved person; and (3) all acts of disposal 8by sale or exchange of an enslaved person, including acts 9involved in the facilitation of these exchanges through the 10provision of financial vehicles or insurance. 11    Section 10. Purpose. 12    (a) Numerous American businesses across various 13industries, including insurance, banking, tobacco, cotton, 14sugar, railroads, and shipping, reaped substantial profits by 15exploiting the uncompensated labor of enslaved persons. 16Consequently, these businesses and the individuals managing 17them directly profited from the labor of enslaved persons and 18directly benefited from insurance policies that insured 19enslaved persons. This intertwining of economic interests 20highlights the extent to which the exploitation of enslaved 21persons permeated the foundation of various American 22industries. However, very few American industries and the 23underlying businesses and individuals have adequately 24acknowledged their connection to the Enslavement Era. 25    (b) The citizens of Illinois, including descendants of   SB2212- 6 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1enslaved persons, are entitled to complete transparency 2regarding any involvement or profits acquired through slavery 3by companies seeking to conduct business in the State. This 4disclosure is essential to ensure that the community is 5informed about the historical connections and practices of the 6companies operating within its jurisdiction, fostering a 7culture of accountability and responsible business practices.8    (c) This Act is a call to the companies that participated 9in slaveholding and the slave trade to acknowledge and address 10the enduring impacts of the Enslavement Era on our society, 11and to promote responsible corporate citizenship. It is 12essential for companies to recognize their historical 13connections to the Enslavement Era and take responsibility for 14any past actions that have contributed to the perpetuation of 15inequities. By actively engaging in redress efforts, 16corporations demonstrate their commitment to fostering a more 17just and equitable society. Remedying the harms resulting from 18the crimes and atrocities of the Enslavement Era is not only a 19moral imperative and an international standard but also a 20crucial step toward ensuring a cohesive and inclusive 21community. This Act serves to facilitate corporate 22transparency and accountability and to encourage the 23implementation of concrete measures aimed at alleviating the 24long-lasting adverse effects of the slave trade on descendants 25of enslaved persons.26    (d) The purpose of this Act is to:  SB2212- 7 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1        (1) promote the investigation of any participation in 2    slaveholding, the slave trade, or both by companies or 3    contractors that do business with the State; 4        (2) establish a system that (i) makes publicly 5    available full and accurate disclosure of company or 6    contractor records related to the participation in 7    slaveholding, the slave trade, or both, (ii) provides the 8    opportunity for public notice and comment before the State 9    contracts with companies or contractors that participated 10    in slaveholding or the slave trade, and (iii) requires 11    disclosure, to the extent applicable, of any records 12    indicating: 13            (A) whether the company or contractor was a party 14        to any insurance policy related to slaveholding; 15            (B) evidence of the purchase, sale, or lease of 16        enslaved persons by the company or contractor; 17            (C) evidence of the use by the company or 18        contractor of enslaved persons as collateral for 19        insurance policies, loans, or other transactions; 20            (D) evidence of the provision, or receipt, of 21        loans by the company or contractor to purchase 22        enslaved persons; 23            (E) evidence of insuring transactions for enslaved 24        persons; and 25            (F) any other company or contractor records 26        evidencing participation in slaveholding or   SB2212- 8 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1        participation in the slave trade;2        (3) encourage corporate transparency and 3    accountability through the establishment of a process 4    pursuant to which the Office shall develop and fund 5    eligible redress projects to assist in redress efforts; 6    and7        (4) establish a governance structure to monitor and 8    enforce the provisions of this Act. 9    Section 15. Findings. 10    (a) Insurance policies from the Enslavement Era, which 11have been discovered in the archives of several insurance 12companies, document insurance coverage to slaveholders for 13damage to or death of enslaved persons. In some cases, 14existing insurance firms or their predecessor firms issued 15these policies. 16    (b) Records may exist that show that various companies, 17either directly or through their parent entities, subsidiaries 18or predecessors in interest or otherwise, bought or sold 19enslaved persons, used enslaved persons as collateral for 20insurance policies or other transactions, provided loans to 21purchase enslaved persons, insured those transactions, and 22provided related or other services to aid and abet those 23transactions. 24    (c) These insurance policies, loan documents, and other 25documents and records provide evidence of ill-gotten profits   SB2212- 9 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1from slavery. Slaveholders and those involved in the slave 2trade, in turn, profited from the uncompensated labor of 3enslaved persons, even if those profits have long since been 4redistributed to shareholders. Industries that profited in 5this manner include, but are not limited to, capitalized 6insurers, financial service providers, textile companies, 7tobacco companies, railroad companies, shipping companies, the 8rice industry, the sugar industry, and entities in other 9industries whose successors in interest remain in existence 10today. 11    (d) The General Assembly finds and declares that the fact 12that slavery was legal in certain parts of the United States at 13the time that it occurred does not make the practice any less 14repugnant, abhorrent, or deplorable, nor does it in any way 15diminish the gravity of these wrongs or the importance of 16rectifying and remediating these tragedies. 17    (e) Many Illinois residents are descendants of enslaved 18persons and their ancestors were defined as property, 19dehumanized, separated from their families, coerced into 20performing labor without appropriate compensation or benefits, 21and were assaulted and abused. Enslaved persons were treated 22as chattel in every sense of the word, including being used as 23collateral for insurance policies, loans, and other 24transactions, and, in some instances, their ancestors' owners 25were compensated for damages by insurers. 26    (f) Appropriate compensation to enslaved persons for their   SB2212- 10 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1labor otherwise would have been bequeathed to their 2descendants. As a result, companies and individuals who 3profited from the labor of enslaved persons were unjustly 4enriched. 5    (g) Residents of Illinois are entitled to the full 6disclosure of any and all information regarding the 7above-described transactions, and respect and recognition of 8the dignity of the enslaved persons and their descendants 9requires it. 10    (h) The General Assembly formally acknowledges the loss of 11assets that rightfully should be the property of descendants 12in the United States and extends its apologies to descendants 13who continue to suffer the legacy of slavery. 14    (i) The General Assembly finds that full disclosure of the 15facts and acknowledgment of the depth and scope of the 16participation in slaveholding and the slave trade and public 17hearings with respect thereto furthers the public interest by 18recognizing the dignity of enslaved persons and descendants 19and promotes healing in the State for enslaved persons, 20descendants, and those who participated in slaveholding or the 21slave trade. 22    (j) The General Assembly finds that public disclosure and 23public hearings based on those disclosures will promote 24knowledge of the nature and scope of the slaveholding and 25slave trading activities in Illinois and thereby will promote 26healing.   SB2212- 11 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1    (k) The State of Illinois finds that the establishment of 2a fund, to which companies and contractors subject to this Act 3shall make monetary contributions, will promote healing and 4assist the State of Illinois in rectifying and remedying some 5of the shameful legacies of slaveholding and the slave trade, 6thereby protecting and promoting the dignity and welfare of 7Illinois residents and the Illinois community. 8    Section 17. Powers of the Administrator. The Administrator 9has the authority to take all actions necessary to implement 10and enforce this Act, subject to the direction and oversight 11of the Office. 12    Section 20. Compliance. 13    (a) Each contractor that participates in a competitive 14bidding process with the State of Illinois shall complete an 15affidavit certifying that, to the knowledge of the contractor, 16the contractor has reviewed the records that are in its 17possession or control or which, following due inquiry, are 18publicly available, including records of any related party, 19for evidence of the contractor's or related party's 20participation in slaveholding or the slave trade. If the 21contractor or any related party to the contractor has 22participated in slaveholding or the slave trade, the affidavit 23shall, to the extent known to contractor, further disclose the 24names and ages of each enslaved person and slaveholder   SB2212- 12 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1described in the records or information, as well as the 2evidence of transactions whereby the contractor, its parent 3entities, subsidiaries, or predecessors entities benefited or 4profited from participation in slaveholding or participation 5in the slave trade.6    Beginning 30 days after the effective date of this Act, 7all contractors that participate in a competitive bidding 8process with the State of Illinois shall submit a completed 9affidavit to the Office by no later than 30 days before the 10submission of the bid to contract with the State. If 11additional time is needed for investigation or review, the 12contractor shall submit a request for extension to the Office 13no later than 30 days before the submission of the bid. The 14request for extension shall provide an overview of the scope 15and nature of the investigation or review and an explanation 16of why additional time is needed to complete the disclosure. 17The contractor shall provide updates regarding completion of 18the affidavit to the Office every 30 days as necessary. 19Notwithstanding the foregoing, the contractor shall submit a 20completed affidavit no later than 90 days after the 21contractor's submission of a bid. 22    (b) All records disclosed in each contractor's affidavit 23shall be reviewed by the Administrator to determine whether 24the contractor or any related party to the contractor 25participated in slaveholding or the slave trade. 26    (c) The Administrator, after consultation with the Office,   SB2212- 13 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1shall publish, within 90 days after submission of the 2affidavit, a public report based on the disclosures in the 3affidavit of each contractor that is found to have 4participated in slaveholding or the slave trade. The report 5shall summarize the nature of the contractor's or related 6party's participation in slaveholding and the slave trade, 7including all relevant information and records disclosed in 8each contractor's affidavit. 9    (d) The Administrator, after consultation with the Office, 10shall hold a public hearing to discuss the report within 45 11days of its delivery to the Governor and General Assembly. The 12Administrator shall make the report publicly available no 13later than 10 business days before the scheduled date of the 14public hearing. A representative for the contractor shall 15attend the public hearing and answer any and all questions 16from Illinois officials and members of the public. The public 17hearing shall be held in an accessible public facility, 18accommodate virtual participation, and be recorded and 19published publicly.20    (e) The Administrator shall provide notice of the public 21hearing to the public no later than 7 business days before the 22scheduled date of the public hearing and provide notice of the 23public hearing to a representative of the contractor that is 24the subject of the report no later than 10 business days before 25the scheduled date of the public hearing. 26    (f) Following the public hearing, the Administrator shall   SB2212- 14 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1provide annual reports regarding further findings or 2disclosures on the part of any company or contractor found to 3have participated in slaveholding and the slave trade, if any.4    (g) Hard copies of the initial and each annual report 5shall be maintained at all University of Illinois Campus 6libraries and shall be made available for public inspection 7upon request. 8    (h) A link to a webpage titled "Enslavement Disclosure and 9Redress" shall be placed on the State of Illinois Internet 10homepage. This Act, and all information pertaining to this 11Act, including names of all contractors who participated in 12slaveholding and the slave trade, affidavits, reports, public 13hearings, contracts, and redress actions, shall be publicly 14accessible through that link.  15    Section 25. Redress Fund; eligible redress projects. 16    (a) The Redress Fund is hereby established as a special 17fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund shall be used by 18the Administrator for the purposes described in this Section. 19Moneys in the Fund shall be used for purposes, including, but 20not limited to, providing educational support and support for 21economic development in the economically depressed areas of 22Illinois subjected to Jim Crow (apartheid) federal and State 23actions, such as redlining, or where a significant proportion 24of private property was seized or otherwise directly impacted 25in relation to projects conducted under the auspices of United   SB2212- 15 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1States Department of Housing and Urban Development grants for 2urban renewal programs.3    (b) The Administrator, after consultation with the Office, 4shall prepare guidelines for the use of moneys in the Fund and 5present those guidelines to the Illinois Legislative Black 6Caucus for approval no later than April 30, 2026. Thereafter, 7the Administrator shall make funding decisions in accordance 8with the guidelines and provide an annual report to the Office 9identifying the recipients of funds and the amount of funds 10contributed to each recipient.11    (c) Each contractor who has disclosed participation in 12slaveholding or the slave trade shall provide the State of 13Illinois with a statement of financial redress at the time of 14submitting its bid. The statement of redress shall include a 15description of any amounts committed to the Redress Fund to 16date or programs developed or funded, or to be developed or 17funded, by the contractor.18    (d) The contractor shall provide its financial 19contributions to the Redress Fund within 30 days after the 20effective date of its contract.21    (e) The Administrator, after consultation with the Office 22and the State Treasurer, shall monitor all contractors that 23are subject to this Act in submitting their statements of 24redress. The Administrator, after consultation with the Office 25and the State Treasurer, shall prepare a report on 26contributions to and expenditures from the Redress Fund and   SB2212- 16 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1each project funded by this Act, including the name of each 2project, the cost of each project, the goal of each project, 3and the authorized redress entities carrying out each project. 4The report shall be submitted to the Governor, the General 5Assembly, and the public as required under this Act.  6    Section 30. Administration. The Administrator, after 7consultation with the Office, shall: 8        (1) adopt rules to implement this Act within 60 days 9    after the effective date of this Act; 10        (2) develop a form disclosure statement and affidavit 11    within 60 days after the effective date of this Act; 12        (3) adopt rules that specify the form and content of 13    the report required in instances where a company or 14    contractor has participated in slaveholding or the slave 15    trade; 16        (4) administer the requirements of this Act and 17    monitor compliance through the Administrator, including 18    investigation of alleged violations; 19        (5) publish and make open for public review annual 20    reports detailing the compliance and noncompliance of 21    relevant companies or contractors; and 22        (6) hold at least one public hearing each year to 23    discuss implementation efforts, annual reports, materials 24    generated by compliance with this Act, and other relevant 25    matters.   SB2212- 17 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1    Section 35. Enforcement. 2    (a) Failure to comply with the requirements of this Act 3shall result in the following sanctions: 4        (1) Any contractor who fails to submit the required 5    affidavit within the specified timeframe shall be debarred 6    from participation in the then current bid with the State 7    of Illinois. 8        (2) Any contractor who willfully or negligently 9    submits a false affidavit or other statement, or neglects 10    to submit the required disclosure, shall be debarred from 11    participation in the then current bid with the State of 12    Illinois. 13        (3) The State of Illinois reserves the right to debar 14    the contractor from participation in the then current bid 15    by providing notice of termination to any contractor after 16    discovering the deficiency in the contractor's disclosure. 17    Notwithstanding the foregoing, a contractor may cure any 18    false or materially false statement, or misstatement by 19    submitting an amended disclosure within 30 days of receipt 20    of the notice of debarment of the contractor. Failure to 21    cure any false or materially false statements within the 22    specified timeframe shall result in the contractor's 23    debarment from participating in the current bid with the 24    State of Illinois and termination of the contractor's 25    contract with the State of Illinois no later than 60 days   SB2212- 18 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1    after such failure to cure. 2        (4) Any contractor who fails to contribute to the 3    Redress Fund within the specified timeframe shall be 4    subject to automatic termination of its contract with the 5    State of Illinois, provided that the contractor receives 6    notice from the State of Illinois of termination after 7    discovering the contractor's failure to contribute to the 8    Redress Fund. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a contractor 9    may cure such failure to contribute by making the 10    committed contribution to the Redress Fund within 30 days 11    of receipt of the notice of termination of the contract. 12        (5) The following parties may bring an action under 13    this Act against a company or contractor subject to this 14    Act to enforce its provisions: 15            (A) the Office; and16            (B) any Illinois resident. 17    (b) Relief under this Act shall include, but shall not be 18limited to, an injunction to mandate the necessary disclosure 19required under this Act or to correct any misstatement, as 20well as reasonable attorney's fees and costs. All or a portion 21of any damages awarded shall be payable to the Redress Fund. 22    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 23severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 24    Section 900. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is   SB2212- 19 -LRB104 12206 HLH 22311 b1amended by adding Section 5-45.62 as follows: 2    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.62 new)3    Sec. 5-45.62. Emergency rulemaking; Enslavement Era 4Disclosure and Redress Act. To provide for the expeditious and 5timely implementation of the Enslavement Era Disclosure and 6Redress Act, emergency rules implementing the Enslavement Era 7Disclosure and Redress Act may be adopted in accordance with 8Section 5-45 by the Illinois Office of Equity. The adoption of 9emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is 10deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 11welfare.12    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 13of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 14    Section 905. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 15Section 5.1030 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)17    Sec. 5.1030. The Redress Fund. 18    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.